apertium-eng.eng.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
<alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="n"/>
		<sdef n="sg"/>
		<sdef n="pl"/>
		<sdef n="vblex"/>
		<sdef n="p1"/>
		<sdef n="pri"/>
		<sdef n="prn"/>
		<sdef n="subj"/>
	</sdefs>
	<pardefs>
	<pardef n="gramophone__n">
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="telephone__n">
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="allophone__n">
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="s/ee__vblex">
		<e><p><l>ee</l><r>ee<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n="prsubj__prn">
		<e><p><l>I</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	</pardefs>
	<section id="main" type="standard">
	<e lm="record player"><i>record<b/>player</i><par n="gramophone__n"/></e>
	<e lm="telephone"><i>telephone</i><par n="telephone__n"/></e>
	<e lm="allophone"><i>allophone</i><par n="allophone__n"/></e>
	<e lm="see"><i>s</i><par n="s/ee__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="personal subject pronouns"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
	</section>
</dictionary>
